Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-2142.02
Enhanced employment area; redevelopment
project; levy of general business occupation tax authorized; governing body;
powers; occupation tax; power
to levy; exceptions.

A city may levy a general
business occupation tax upon the businesses and users of space within an enhanced
employment area for the purpose of paying all or any part of the costs and
expenses of any redevelopment project within such enhanced employment area. After March 27, 2014, any occupation tax imposed pursuant
to this section shall make a reasonable classification of businesses, users
of space, or kinds of transactions for purposes of imposing such tax, except
that no occupation tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is subject
to tax under section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146,
77-2602, or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section 77-2704.24. The
collection of a tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be made and enforced
in such a manner as the governing body shall by ordinance determine to produce
the required revenue. The governing body may provide that failure to pay the
tax imposed pursuant to this section shall constitute a violation of the ordinance
and subject the violator to a fine or other punishment as provided by ordinance.
Any such occupation tax agreed to by the authority and the city shall remain
in effect so long as the authority has bonds outstanding which have been issued
stating such occupation tax as an available source for payment.

Laws 2007, LB562, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB474, § 6.